Utah statutes.
17-43-304.   Contracts for mental health services provided by local mental
health authorities.
If a local mental health authority has established a plan to provide services
authorized by this part, and those services meet standards fixed by rules of
the division, the local mental health authority may enter into a contract with
the division for those services to be furnished by that local mental health
authority for an agreed compensation to be paid by the division.
